Connecticut, session 2026, SB00255.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The State Building
Inspector and the Codes and Standards Committee acting jointly, with
the approval of the Commissioner of Administrative Services, shall
establish a program to certify independent inspectors and independent
inspection firms to perform inspections under the State Building Code
for submission to a local building official. The program shall establish:
(1) One or more classifications of independent inspectors and
independent inspection firms, specifying the duties, responsibilities,
minimum qualifications and insurance requirements for each
classification of inspector or firm; and (2) an oversight and audit
program administered by the State Building Inspector to ensure the
consistency and quality of inspections performed by certified inspectors
and firms. The State Building Inspector may charge a reasonable fee to
apply for certification, provided the State Building Inspector may waive
such fee for any person who applies, in the form and manner prescribed
LCO No. 1691 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 255
by the State Building Inspector, and demonstrates that the person is
financially unable to pay such fee.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section